Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20192-2656
Nebraska aerial pesticide business license; application; form; contents; fee; resident agent or consent to jurisdiction.

(1) An application for an initial or renewal Nebraska aerial pesticide business license shall be submitted to the department prior to the commencement of aerial spraying operations, and an application for renewal of a Nebraska aerial pesticide business license shall be submitted to the department before commencement of application of pesticides. The application shall be accompanied by an annual license fee of one hundred dollars. The license fee may be increased by the director after a public hearing is held outlining the reason for any proposed change in the fee, except that the fee shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars. All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Pesticide Administrative Cash Fund. The application shall be on a form prescribed by the department and shall include the following:

(a) The full name and permanent mailing address of the person applying for such license. If such applicant is an individual, the application shall include the applicant's personal mailing address. If such applicant is not an individual, the full name of each partner or member or the full name of the principal officers shall be given on the application;

(b) The location of the applicant's principal departure location and any additional departure locations utilized for aerial spraying operations to be conducted within Nebraska identified by one of the following: Global Positioning System coordinates, legal description, local address of the site, or airport identifier;

(c) A copy of the applicant's agricultural aircraft operator certificate issued pursuant to 14 C.F.R. part 137 or evidence the applicant holds such a certificate issued by the Federal Aviation Administration;

(d) The aircraft registration number issued by the Federal Aviation Administration pursuant to 14 C.F.R. part 47 of all aircraft owned, rented, or leased by the applicant to be utilized for aerial pesticide applications and all other aircraft utilized in aerial spraying operations conducted by the applicant;

(e) The Nebraska commercial applicator certificate number and current Federal Aviation Administration commercial pilot certificate number of all persons operating aircraft for the aerial application of pesticides during any aerial spraying operations conducted by the applicant; and

(f) Such other information as deemed necessary by the director to determine the suitability of the applicant for licensure as an aerial pesticide business.

(2) An applicant located outside this state shall file with the department either a written designation of a resident agent for service of process or a written consent to the jurisdiction of this state for actions taken in the administration and enforcement of the Pesticide Act.

Laws 2010, LB254, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB69, § 13;

Laws 2019, LB320, § 20.
September 1, 2019